Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Agricultural owner or operator”  means a landowner, operator, manager or other
person having responsibility for exercising  control over the day-to-day operation of a farm
or ranch.
(2) “Working land” means land that is actively used by an agricultural  owner or operator
for an agricultural operation that includes, but need not be limited to, active  engagement in
farming or ranching.
(3) “Working land conservation covenant” means a nonpossessory interest  in working
land for a fixed term that imposes limitations or affirmative obligations for the purposes that
support the use of  the land for agricultural production and for the maintenance or en-
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 1
hancement of fish and wildlife habitat, improvement of water quality or support  of other
natural resource values.
(4) “Working land  conservation easement” means a permanent nonpossessory interest in
working land that imposes limitations or affirmative obligations for purposes that  support
the use of the land for agricultural production and for the maintenance or  enhancement of
fish and wildlife habitat, improvement  of water quality or support of other natural resource
values.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund is established  in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Ag-
ricultural Heritage Fund shall be  credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board for the purpose of carrying  out
sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The board may accept contributions to  the fund from any public or private source and
may agree to any conditions  for the expenditure of those contributions that are consistent
with the purposes of the fund.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board may expend moneys from
the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund to:
(a) Carry out the programs described in section 6 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Pay reimbursements and staff support expenses associated with the activities of the
Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission established under section 7 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Provide succession planning programs with funding recommended by the commission
under section 10 of this 2017 Act; and
(d) Pay the administrative expenses of the board for carrying out  sections 1 to 10 of this
2017 Act.
(2) The amount paid from the fund  during a biennium for reimbursements and expenses
described in subsection (1)(b) and (d)  of this section may not exceed 12 percent of the moneys
credited to the fund during that biennium.
SECTION 4.
(1) An agricultural owner or operator may enter into  a conservation man-
agement plan with an organization for working land to be managed  in a manner that sup-
ports one or more natural resource values. The  conservation management plan may be
composed of multiple components addressing different  natural resource values as identified
in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A conservation management plan must be for  the purpose of developing and imple-
menting conservation measures or other protections for  maintaining or enhancing fish or
wildlife habitat, improving water quality or supporting other natural resource values  in a
manner consistent with the social and economic interests  and abilities of the agricultural
owner or  operator. The plan may include provisions for addressing particular priorities re-
lated to natural resource  values, including but not limited to soil, water, plants, animals,
energy and human need considerations.
(3) A conservation management plan must:
(a) Meet the standards established by Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board rules;
(b) State the duration or terminating event for the plan;
(c) Be specific to the land, and account for the needs of, the agricultural owner or op-
erator;
(d) Provide for the parties to review the plan on a regular basis;
(e) Provide for flexibility and allow for mutual modification as necessary to reflect
changes in practices or circumstances;
(f) Provide for regular monitoring by the organization to ensure that the agricultural
owner or operator is adhering to the plan;
(g) Make any receipt by  the agricultural owner or operator of annual payments for car-
rying out the plan contingent on adherence to the plan; and
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 2
(h) Limit  any annual payments for carrying out the plan to a term of not less than 20
years or more than 50 years.
(4) An organization that enters into, or  proposes to enter into, a conservation manage-
ment plan may apply to the  board for a grant to fund the purchasing, implementing, carrying
out or monitoring of the plan if the organization is:
(a) A holder, as defined in ORS 271.715, other than a state agency;
(b) A watershed council; or
(c) Tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 5.
(1) An owner of working land may enter into a working  land conservation
covenant with or grant a working land conservation easement to an organization that is a
holder, as defined in ORS 271.715, other than a  state agency. The covenant or easement must
be for the purpose of ensuring the continued use of the land for  agricultural purposes while
maintaining or enhancing fish or  wildlife habitat, improving water quality or supporting
other natural resource values on the land. A working  land conservation covenant must be
for a term of years that is established as  permissible in Oregon Agricultural Heritage Com-
mission rules.
(2) In addition to the purposes required under subsection (1) of this section, a  working
land conservation covenant or working land conservation easement may provide for  carrying
out any purposes  of a conservation easement, as defined in ORS 271.715. The covenant or
easement must provide for carrying out those additional purposes in  a manner consistent
with ORS 271.715 to 271.795.
(3) A working land conservation covenant or working land conservation easement must:
(a) Provide for regular monitoring  by the organization accepting the covenant or ease-
ment to ensure that the owner of the working land is  adhering to the covenant or easement
provisions; and
(b) If  identical in duration to a conservation management plan for the working land, refer
to the conservation management plan in the text of the covenant or easement.
(4) An organization that enters into, or proposes to enter into,  a working land conser-
vation covenant or  accept a working land conservation easement may apply to the Oregon
Watershed Enhancement Board for a grant to fund the purchasing, implementing,  carrying
out or monitoring of the covenant or easement.
(5) An application under subsection (4)  of this section may be combined with an applica-
tion under section 4 of this 2017 Act for  a grant to fund a conservation management plan
associated with the working land conservation covenant or working  land conservation ease-
ment.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall establish programs to
provide grants from the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund for the purposes of:
(a) Assisting owners of working land with succession planning for those lands;
(b) Funding the purchasing, implementing, carrying out  or monitoring of conservation
management plans, working land conservation  covenants or working land conservation
easements described in sections 4 and 5 of this 2017 Act; and
(c) Providing development funding or technical assistance to organizations that enter
into or propose to enter  into agreements resulting in conservation management plans, or
that accept or propose to accept working land conservation  covenants or working land con-
servation easements.
(2) The board,  after consultation with the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission es-
tablished in section 7 of this 2017  Act, shall adopt rules that establish a process for submit-
ting and processing applications for grants under sections 4 and 5 of this 2017 Act.  To the
extent practicable, the board shall design the process to:
(a) Allow flexibility and responsiveness to program participant needs; and
(b) Ensure compatibility  with federal working land conservation easement programs and
other programs for the conservation of working land.
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 3
(3) The board and the commission, shall jointly appoint one or more technical committees
to evaluate and rank conservation  management plans, working land conservation covenants
and working land conservation easements described in applications filed under  sections 4 and
5 of this 2017 Act.  The system used by the technical committee or committees shall provide
for the ranking of conservation  management plans to be separate from the ranking of
working land conservation covenants and working land conservation easements. The  ranking
for a plan, covenant or easement shall be based on  criteria that include, but need not be
limited to:
(a) The extent to which the plan, covenant or  easement would protect, maintain or en-
hance farming or ranching on working land;
(b) The extent to which the plan,  covenant or easement would protect, maintain or en-
hance fish or wildlife habitat,  improve water quality or support other natural resource val-
ues;
(c) The extent to which the plan, covenant or  easement would protect agricultural out-
comes, benefits or other investment gains;
(d) The capacity of the  organization that filed the application to enter into a conservation
management plan,  accept a working land conservation covenant or working land conserva-
tion easement, and the competence of the organization;
(e) The extent to which the benefit to the state from the investment may  be maximized,
based on the ability to leverage grant moneys with other funding sources and on the duration
and extent of the conservation management plan, working  land conservation covenant or
working land conservation easement; and
(f) The extent and nature of plan,  covenant or easement impacts on owners or operators
of neighboring lands.
(4) The criteria for  ranking conservation management plans, working land conservation
covenants or working land conservation easements under  subsection (3) of this section may
not include a consideration of the type of agricultural operation conducted on the working
land.
(5) An applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board  that the participants
in a conservation management plan, working land conservation covenant or working land
conservation easement to be benefitted by a grant under this section understand and agree
to their roles and responsibilities under the plan, covenant or easement.
(6) The board may issue a grant to fund  a conservation management plan, working land
conservation covenant or working land  conservation easement described in sections 4 and 5
of this 2017 Act only if:
(a) There is a contribution of cash for the plan, covenant or easement, a contribution
of in-kind services or another form of investment in the plan, covenant or easement  from a
funding source other than the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund;
(b) The plan, covenant or easement is reviewed by a technical committee that  has ex-
pertise relevant to the described plan, covenant or easement; and
(c) The commission reviews and recommends funding  of the plan, covenant or easement.
(7) Except as provided in this subsection, an organization that receives a  grant from the
board for a conservation management plan, or an agricultural owner or operator receiving
payments of moneys  from an organization grant regarding a conservation management plan,
may receive cash contributions, other  financial assistance, in-kind services or investments,
rental or easement payments, tax benefits or other benefits from  a federal, state or private
entity in return for practices related  to the purchasing, implementing, carrying out or
monitoring of the conservation  management plan. The board or an organization grant may
not, however, provide payments that duplicate any federal, state or private payments for the
same measures  directed to maintaining or enhancing fish or wildlife habitat, improving water
quality or supporting other natural resource values within the plan.
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 4
(8) An organization that receives a grant from the board for a working  land conservation
covenant or working land conservation easement, or an owner of working  land that enters
into a working land conservation covenant or grants a working land  conservation easement,
may receive cash contributions, other financial assistance, in-kind  services or other forms
of investment from any public or  private sources for purposes of purchasing, implementing,
carrying out or monitoring of the covenant or easement.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission is established, consisting
of 12 members appointed by the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board. The board shall
appoint one board member to serve on an ex officio basis as a nonvoting member of  the
commission. The board shall appoint 11 voting members from among persons recommended
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Four members shall be persons recommended by the State Board of Agriculture
who are actively engaged in farming or ranching. The  members must represent diverse types
of agricultural commodities and be from geographically diverse areas of this state.
(b) One member shall  be recommended by the Director of the Oregon State University
Extension Service.
(c) Two members shall be persons recommended by the State Fish  and Wildlife Com-
mission who have expertise regarding fish and wildlife habitat.
(d) One  member shall be a person recommended by the State Board of Agriculture who
has expertise in agricultural water quality.
(e) One member shall be a person recommended  by the Land Conservation and Develop-
ment Commission who has expertise in conservation easements and similar land transfers.
(f) One member shall be a person selected by the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board
who is a representative of natural resource value interests.
(g) One member shall be  a person selected by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board
who is a representative of Indian tribal interests.
(3) The term of office of each voting member of the Oregon  Agricultural Heritage Com-
mission is four years,  but the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board may remove a member
if requested by the authority that recommended the member.  Before the term of a member
expires, the authority that recommended the member shall make recommendations  to the
board regarding the appointment of a successor. An authority may  recommend the reap-
pointment of a member, but a member may not serve more than two consecutive terms.  If
there is a  vacancy for any cause, the authority that recommended the vacating member shall
make recommendations to the board regarding the appointment of a successor to serve for
the unexpired term.
SECTION 8.
(1) The  Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission shall select one of its
voting members as chairperson and another voting member as vice chairperson, for  terms
and with duties  and powers necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices as
the commission determines.
(2) A majority of the voting members  of the commission constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(3) The commission shall meet at least once every 12  months at a time and place deter-
mined by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.  The commission also may meet at
other times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or of  a majority of the voting
members of the commission.
(4) Members of  the commission are not entitled to compensation but, at the discretion
of the board, may be reimbursed from funds available in the  Oregon Agricultural Heritage
Fund for actual  and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by the members in the
performance of official duties in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
(5) The board shall provide staff support for the work of the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 5
SECTION 9. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the Oregon
Agricultural Heritage Commission may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the
laws that the commission is charged with administering.
(2) The commission may establish any advisory or technical  committee the commission
considers necessary to aid and advise the  commission in the performance of its functions.
The committees may be continuing or temporary committees. The commission shall deter-
mine the representation, membership, terms and organization of  the committees and shall
appoint the members of the committees. The commission chairperson shall be a  nonvoting
member of each committee.
(3) Members of advisory or  technical committees established by the commission are not
entitled to compensation but, at the discretion  of the commission and with the consent of
the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, may be  reimbursed from funds available to the
board for actual and necessary travel and other expenses  incurred by the members in the
performance of official duties in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission shall:
(a) Assist the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board  with the development of rules for
the administration of programs under sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Adopt rules establishing three or more permissible terms of years, that are not  less
than 20 or more than 50 years, for working land conservation covenants formed  under sec-
tion 5 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Recommend policies and priorities  for use by the board in evaluating the farm or
ranch values, and the fish or wildlife habitat, water quality or other natural resource  values,
on working land described in a grant application filed under section 4 or 5 of this 2017 Act;
(d) Review and consider the recommendations of technical committees appointed under
section 6 of this 2017 Act;
(e) Consult with the board concerning grant applications;
(f) Provide conservation  management plan, working land conservation covenant and
working land conservation easement funding recommendations to the  board based on the
availability of funding from the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund; and
(g) Provide funding recommendations to the Legislative Assembly, or recommendations
for grant funding to  the board, to provide training and support to owners of working land,
or persons advising owners of working land, regarding succession planning for the lands.
(2) The commission’s recommendations for  funding under subsection (1)(g) of this section
may include recommendations for funding succession planning  programs through the Oregon
State University Extension Service only if the  university has presented the commission with
a program proposal for review.  If a commission recommendation for funding succession
planning programs through the university extension service is adopted,  the university shall
provide the commission with an annual report regarding each program.
SECTION 11.
(1) As used in this section “working land” has the meaning given that term
in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The  Legislative Policy and Research Director, in consultation with the Department
of Revenue and the State  Department of Agriculture, shall conduct a study examining fi-
nancial incentives, incremental tax  reduction and tax elimination with regard to land trans-
fer and succession planning for working land. The study must include,  but need not be
limited to, the identification of potential tax incentives and financial management tools that
may improve the likelihood for land  transfer and succession planning that supports the
continued use of working land for agricultural operations while maintaining or enhancing
fish or wildlife  habitat, improving water quality or supporting other natural resource values
of the land.
(3) In conducting the  study, the director shall consult with state agencies and members
of the public  that have an interest in policy considerations related to the identification and
proposal of potential tax incentives and financial management tools.
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 6
(4) The director shall complete the study and report  findings and any recommendations
to an  interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2018.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding the term of office  specified by section 7 of this 2017 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Oregon Agricultural Heritage Commission:
(1) One of the members recommended by the State Board of  Agriculture who is actively
engaged in farming or ranching shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2019.
(2) One of the members  recommended by the State Board of Agriculture who is actively
engaged in farming or ranching shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2020.
(3) One of the members recommended by the State Board of  Agriculture who is actively
engaged in farming or ranching shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2021.
(4) One of the members  recommended by the State Board of Agriculture who is actively
engaged in farming or ranching shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
(5) One of the members recommended by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall
serve for a term ending January 1, 2019.
(6) One of the members recommended by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall
serve for a term ending January 1, 2021.
(7) The member recommended by the Director of the Oregon State University  Extension
Service shall serve a term ending January 1, 2020.
(8) The  member selected by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board who is a repre-
sentative of natural resource value interests shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2020.
(9) The member recommended by the State Board of Agriculture who has expertise  in
agricultural water quality shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2021.
(10) The member recommended by  the Land Conservation and Development Commission
shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
(11) The member selected  by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board who is a rep-
resentative of Indian tribal interests shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
SECTION 13.  Notwithstanding section 3 of this 2017 Act,  the amounts paid from the
Oregon Agricultural Heritage Fund for the  administrative expenses of the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board and the reimbursements and staff support expenses of  activities asso-
ciated with the Oregon Agricultural Heritage  Commission incurred on or before June 30,
2019, may exceed 12 percent of the moneys credited  to the fund during the biennium ending
June 30, 2019.
SECTION 14. Sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act apply  to agreements and interests in land
that:
(1) Are created on or after January 1, 2018; or
(2) Are the subject  of an application for funding from the Oregon Agricultural Heritage
Fund.
SECTION 15.
 Sections 1 to 10 and 12 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
SECTION 16. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $190,000 which may be expended for carrying
out sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 7
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 8